Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-240
Emergency purposes, defined.

Emergency purposes means any situation affecting the health and safety of a consumer.

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1204;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 102.